Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0147.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2534. (1) For publishing a legal notice or an order, citation, summons, advertisement, or other matter arising out of judicial proceedings required by law to be published in a newspaper, except as provided in subsection (2), the cost must not exceed the rate of $20.50 per folio for the first publication and $8.45 per folio for each subsequent publication. A minimum cost of $59.00 is allowed for a notice that must be published 2 times or more, and a minimum cost of $44.00 is allowed for a notice that must be published 1 time. (2) For publications after the effective date of the October 10, 2017, public act that amended this section, the department of treasury shall adjust the rates described in subsection (1) to reflect the percentage increase in the United States consumer price index Consumer Price Index from March 1, 2008 to June 1, 2017 and, annually each year from beginning March 1, 2018, to March 1, 2025, shall further adjust the rates by the percentage increase in the United States consumer price index Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year. The result of an adjustment under this subsection must be rounded to the nearest multiple of 5 cents. (3) A newspaper that publishes an advertisement for this state other than a tax list may charge for the advertisement its regular established commercial rate in effect at the time the advertisement is published. (4) A newspaper that accepts for publication a legal or public notice as provided by law shall not charge higher rates or collect higher rates for political notices or political advertising than it charges for commercial advertising of the same or similar size.